Maryland, session 2026, HB0545.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Business Occupations and Professions
17–322.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0545*

HOUSE BILL 545
(b) Subject to the hearing provisions of § 17–324 of this subtitle, the Commission
may deny a license to any applicant, reprimand any licensee, or suspend or revoke a license
if the applicant or licensee:
(30) fails to make the disclosure or provide the consent form required by §
17–530.2 OR § 17–554 of this title;
17–532.
(a) [A] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PART VI OF THIS SUBTITLE, A licensee shall
comply with the provisions of this section when providing real estate brokerage services.
17–549. RESERVED.
17–550. RESERVED.
PART VI. TRANSACTION BROKERS.
17–551.
(A) IN THIS PART FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS INDICATED.
(B) “BROKER” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 17–528 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(C) “BROKERAGE AGREEMENT” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 17–528 OF
THIS SUBTITLE.
(D) “CONFIDENTIAL INFORMATION” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 17–528
OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(E) “TIMELY” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 17–528 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(F) “TRANSACTION BROKER” MEANS A LICENSEE WHO PROVIDES REAL
ESTATE BROKERAGE SERVICES TO A SELLER AND A BUYER OR A LESSOR AND A
LESSEE IN A REAL ESTATE TRANSACTION BUT DOES NOT REPRESENT EITHER PARTY
TO THE TRANSACTION IN AN AGENCY RELATIONSHIP.
(G) “TRANSACTION BROKERAGE” MEANS EACH RELATIONSHIP IN WHICH A
LICENSEE ACTS AS A TRANSACTION BROKER.
17–552.
(A) THIS PART APPLIES ONLY TO:

HOUSE BILL 545 3
(1) THE SALE OR LEASE OF REAL PROPERTY IMPROVED BY ONE, TWO,
THREE, OR FOUR SINGLE–FAMILY UNITS; AND
(2) UNIMPROVED REAL PROPERTY ZONED FOR RESIDENTIAL USE BY
THE LOCAL ZONING AUTHORITY OF THE COUNTY OR MUNICIPALITY IN WHICH THE
REAL PROPERTY IS LOCATED.
(B) THIS PART DOES NOT APPLY TO A LEASE OF 125 DAYS OR LESS.
17–553.
(A) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, A
LICENSED REAL ESTATE BROKER, A LICENSED ASSOCIATE REAL ESTATE BROKER,
OR A LICENSED REAL ESTATE SALESPERSON MAY NOT ACT AS A TRANSACTION
BROKER IN THE STATE.
(B) IF A LICENSEE OBTAINS THE WRITTEN INFORMED CONSENT OF ALL
PARTIES TO A REAL ESTATE TRANSACTION, THE LICENSEE MAY ACT AS A
TRANSACTION BROKER FOR BOTH THE SELLER AND THE BUYER OR THE LESSOR AND
THE LESSEE IN A REAL ESTATE TRANSACTION.
(C) THE WRITTEN CONSENT FOR A TRANSACTION BROKERAGE SHALL
INCLUDE A STATEMENT THAT:
(1) AS A TRANSACTION BROKER, THE BROKER DOES NOT REPRESENT
EITHER THE SELLER OR THE BUYER OR THE LESSOR OR THE LESSEE AND IT MAY BE
ADVISABLE TO SEEK INDIVIDUAL REPRESENTATION BECAUSE THE INTERESTS OF
THE SELLER AND THE BUYER OR THE LESSOR AND THE LESSEE MAY BE DIFFERENT
OR ADVERSE;
(2) AS A TRANSACTION BROKER, THE BROKER OWES ONLY LIMITED
FIDUCIARY DUTIES AND OWES THE LIMITED FIDUCIARY DUTIES TO THE SELLER AND
THE BUYER OR THE LESSOR AND THE LESSEE AS ESTABLISHED UNDER § 17–556 OF
THIS SUBTITLE;
(3) A TRANSACTION BROKER MAY NOT DISCLOSE CONFIDENTIAL
INFORMATION IN VIOLATION OF § 17–556(D) OF THIS SUBTITLE;
(4) THE SELLER OR THE BUYER OR THE LESSOR OR THE LESSEE IS
NOT REQUIRED TO CONSENT TO THE TRANSACTION BROKERAGE;
(5) THE SELLER AND THE BUYER OR THE LESSOR AND THE LESSEE
HAVE VOLUNTARILY CONSENTED TO THE TRANSACTION BROKERAGE; AND

HOUSE BILL 545
(6) THE TERMS OF THE TRANSACTION BROKERAGE ARE UNDERSTOOD
BY THE SELLER AND THE BUYER OR THE LESSOR AND THE LESSEE.
(D) (1) A PARTY TO A REAL ESTATE TRANSACTION MAY WITHDRAW
CONSENT TO A TRANSACTION BROKERAGE BY REQUESTING THE WITHDRAWAL IN
WRITING.
(2) IN ANY RESIDENTIAL REAL ESTATE TRANSACTION, A
TRANSACTION BROKER SHALL WITHDRAW FROM A TRANSACTION BROKERAGE IF A
PARTY TO THE TRANSACTION WITHDRAWS CONSENT TO THE TRANSACTION
BROKERAGE IN ACCORDANCE WITH PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
17–554.
(A) A LICENSEE WHO PARTICIPATES IN A REAL ESTATE TRANSACTION AS A
TRANSACTION BROKER SHALL USE A STANDARD CONSENT FORM THAT INCLUDES
THE INFORMATION SPECIFIED IN § 17–553 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(B) (1) THE COMMISSION SHALL PREPARE AND PROVIDE THE STANDARD
CONSENT FORM REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION TO EACH
LICENSEE IN THE STATE.
(2) THE STANDARD CONSENT FORM FOR A TRANSACTION
BROKERAGE SHALL BE:
(I) WRITTEN IN A CLEAR AND COHERENT MANNER USING
WORDS WITH COMMON AND EVERYDAY MEANINGS;
(II) APPROPRIATELY DIVIDED AND CAPTIONED BY THE VARIOUS
SECTIONS; AND
(III) PRINTED IN AT LEAST 12 POINT TYPE.
17–555.
THIS PART DOES NOT PROHIBIT A TRANSACTION BROKER AND THE PARTIES
TO A REAL ESTATE TRANSACTION FROM ENTERING A BROKERAGE AGREEMENT THAT
IMPOSES ON A LICENSEE DUTIES AND OBLIGATIONS IN ADDITION TO THE DUTIES
AND OBLIGATIONS SPECIFIED IN § 17–556 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
17–556.

HOUSE BILL 545 5
(A) A TRANSACTION BROKER SHALL COMPLY WITH THE PROVISIONS OF
THIS SECTION WHEN PROVIDING REAL ESTATE BROKERAGE SERVICES IN A
TRANSACTION BROKERAGE.
(B) A TRANSACTION BROKER:
(1) DOES NOT REPRESENT EITHER PARTY TO THE REAL ESTATE
TRANSACTION IN AN AGENCY CAPACITY; BUT
(2) AS ESTABLISHED UNDER THIS SECTION, OWES LIMITED
FIDUCIARY DUTIES TO EACH PARTY TO THE REAL ESTATE TRANSACTION.
(C) A TRANSACTION BROKER SHALL:
(1) ACT IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE TERMS OF THE BROKERAGE
AGREEMENT;
(2) FACILITATE A SALE OR A LEASE OF REAL ESTATE IN ACCORDANCE
WITH THE TERMS OF THE BROKERAGE AGREEMENT OR OTHER TERMS ACCEPTABLE
TO THE PARTIES TO THE REAL ESTATE TRANSACTION;
(3) UNLESS OTHERWISE SPECIFIED IN THE BROKERAGE AGREEMENT,
PRESENT IN A TIMELY MANNER ALL WRITTEN OFFERS OR COUNTEROFFERS TO AND
FROM THE PARTIES TO THE TRANSACTION;
(4) DISCLOSE TO THE PARTIES TO THE TRANSACTION ALL MATERIAL
FACTS AS REQUIRED UNDER § 17–322 OF THIS TITLE;
(5) TREAT ALL PARTIES TO THE TRANSACTION HONESTLY AND
FAIRLY AND ANSWER ALL QUESTIONS TRUTHFULLY;
(6) IN A TIMELY MANNER ACCOUNT FOR ALL TRUST MONEY
RECEIVED;
(7) EXERCISE REASONABLE CARE AND DILIGENCE; AND
(8) COMPLY WITH ALL:
(I) REQUIREMENTS OF THIS TITLE;
(II) APPLICABLE FEDERAL, STATE, AND LOCAL FAIR HOUSING
LAWS AND REGULATIONS; AND

HOUSE BILL 545
(III) OTHER APPLICABLE LAWS AND REGULATIONS.
(D) UNLESS A PARTY TO THE REAL ESTATE TRANSACTION CONSENTS IN
WRITING TO THE DISCLOSURE, A TRANSACTION BROKER MAY NOT DISCLOSE
CONFIDENTIAL INFORMATION ABOUT OR RECEIVED FROM THE PARTY TO:
(1) THE OTHER PARTY TO THE REAL ESTATE TRANSACTION;
(2) A LICENSEE ACTING AS THE AGENT OF THE OTHER PARTY; OR
(3) ANY OTHER REPRESENTATIVE OF THE OTHER PARTY.
(E) A TRANSACTION BROKER DOES NOT HAVE A DUTY TO:
(1) CONDUCT AN INDEPENDENT INSPECTION OF THE REAL PROPERTY
IN A REAL ESTATE TRANSACTION;
(2) INDEPENDENTLY EXAMINE THE RESPECTIVE FINANCIAL
CONDITIONS OF THE PARTIES TO A REAL ESTATE TRANSACTION; OR
(3) INDEPENDENTLY VERIFY THE ACCURACY OR COMPLETENESS OF
STATEMENTS MADE BY:
(I) A PARTY TO A REAL ESTATE TRANSACTION;
(II) ANY LICENSEE ACTING AS THE AGENT OF A PARTY; OR
(III) ANY OTHER REPRESENTATIVE OF A PARTY.
17–557.
(A) A TRANSACTIONAL BROKERAGE COMMENCES AT THE TIME THAT A
TRANSACTION BROKER AND THE PARTIES TO THE REAL ESTATE TRANSACTION
ENTER INTO A BROKERAGE AGREEMENT AND SHALL CONTINUE UNTIL:
(1) THE COMPLETION OF PERFORMANCE IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE
BROKERAGE AGREEMENT; OR
(2) THE EARLIER OF:
(I) ANY DATE OF EXPIRATION AS AGREED ON BY THE PARTIES
IN THE BROKERAGE AGREEMENT OR IN ANY AMENDMENTS TO THE BROKERAGE
AGREEMENT;

HOUSE BILL 545 7
(II) ANY MUTUALLY AGREED ON TERMINATION OF THE
TRANSACTION BROKERAGE;
(III) A DEFAULT BY ANY PARTY UNDER THE TERMS OF THE
BROKERAGE AGREEMENT; OR
(IV) A TERMINATION UNDER § 17–553(D) OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(B) THE BROKERAGE AGREEMENT BETWEEN A TRANSACTION BROKER AND
THE PARTIES TO THE REAL ESTATE TRANSACTION SHALL:
(1) HAVE A DEFINITE TERMINATION DATE THAT IS EFFECTIVE
AUTOMATICALLY WITHOUT NOTICE FROM ANY PARTY;
(2) STATE THE AMOUNT OF COMPENSATION TO BE PAID TO THE
TRANSACTION BROKER;
(3) STATE WHETHER THE TRANSACTION BROKER IS AUTHORIZED TO
COOPERATE WITH OTHER BROKERS AND SHARE COMPENSATION WITH THE OTHER
BROKERS AND THE AMOUNT OF THE COMPENSATION DESCRIBED AS A PERCENTAGE
OF THE PURCHASE PRICE, A SPECIFIC DOLLAR AMOUNT, OR A COMBINATION OF
BOTH;
(4) EXPLAIN THE EVENTS OR CONDITIONS THAT WILL ENTITLE THE
TRANSACTION BROKER TO A COMMISSION OR OTHER COMPENSATION;
(5) CONTAIN A PROVISION FOR THE CANCELLATION OF THE
TRANSACTION BROKERAGE BY EITHER A PARTY TO THE TRANSACTION OR THE
TRANSACTION BROKER OR BY MUTUAL AGREEMENT OF THE PARTIES TO THE
TRANSACTION AND THE TRANSACTION BROKER; AND
(6) CONTAIN A CLEAR AND PROMINENT STATEMENT THAT A
TRANSACTION BROKER IS NOT AN AGENT OF AND DOES NOT REPRESENT EITHER
PARTY TO THE TRANSACTION, AND IF A PARTY TO THE TRANSACTION WOULD
PREFER A LICENSEE TO ACT AS AN AGENT OF AND REPRESENT THE PARTY AND THE
PARTY’S INTERESTS DURING THE TRANSACTION, THE PARTY SHOULD CONSIDER
ENTERING A BROKERAGE AGREEMENT WITH A LICENSEE TO ACT AS A SELLER’S
AGENT OR A BUYER’S AGENT.
(C) EXCEPT AS OTHERWISE PROVIDED IN THE BROKERAGE AGREEMENT, A
TRANSACTION BROKER SHALL HAVE NO FURTHER DUTIES OR OBLIGATIONS TO THE
PARTIES TO THE REAL ESTATE TRANSACTION AFTER THE TERMINATION,

HOUSE BILL 545
EXPIRATION, OR COMPLETION OF PERFORMANCE OF THE TRANSACTION
BROKERAGE, EXCEPT TO ACCOUNT FOR ALL TRUST MONEY IN THE LICENSEE’S
POSSESSION IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS TITLE.
(D) THE PAYMENT OR PROMISE OF PAYMENT OF COMPENSATION TO A
LICENSED REAL ESTATE BROKER BY A SELLER, LESSOR, BUYER, OR LESSEE, OR BY
A LICENSEE ACTING FOR A SELLER, LESSOR, BUYER, OR LESSEE:
(1) IS NOT DETERMINATIVE OF WHETHER A TRANSACTION
BROKERAGE HAS BEEN CREATED OR EXISTS; AND
(2) DOES NOT CREATE OR DETERMINE THE EXISTENCE OF A
TRANSACTION BROKERAGE BETWEEN A TRANSACTION BROKER AND A SELLER,
LESSOR, BUYER, LESSEE, OR LICENSEE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.